Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-156
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-155 to 43-160, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Adoption involving exchange of information shall mean an adoption of a child in which one or both of the child's biological parents contract with the department for information about the child obtained through his or her adoptive family;

(2) Exchange-of-information contract shall mean a two-year, renewable obligation, voluntarily agreed to and signed by both the adoptive and biological parent or parents as well as the department; and

(3) Department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1988, LB 301, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 122.